Utah statutes.
53B-2-107.   Appropriations reallocation for 2001-2002 fiscal year.
(1)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Title 63J, Chapter 1, Budgetary
Procedures Act, appropriations for the support of higher education for the
fiscal year beginning July 1, 2001 and ending June 30, 2002, may be
reallocated between line items as provided in this section.
(2) (a)  The president of the University of Utah may reallocate between line
items the appropriations:
(i)  described in Items 143-150 and Item 152 in Laws of Utah 2001, Chapter
334; and
(ii)  as modified by:
(A)  H.B. 1, 2002 General Session; and
(B)  H.B. 3, 2002 General Session.
(b)  The total amount of money reallocated may not exceed the sum of the
reductions made in H.B. 1, 2002 General Session and H.B. 3, 2002 General
Session.
(3) (a)  The president of Utah State University may reallocate between line
items the appropriations:
(i)  described in Items 154-166 in Laws of Utah 2001, Chapter 334; and
(ii)  as modified by:
(A)  H.B. 1, 2002 General Session; and
(B)  H.B. 3, 2002 General Session.
(b)  The total amount of money reallocated may not exceed the sum of the
reductions made in H.B. 1, 2002 General Session and H.B. 3, 2002 General
Session.
(4) (a)  The president of Weber State University may reallocate between line
items the  appropriations:
(i)  described in Items 168 and 169 in Laws of Utah 2001, Chapter 334; and
(ii)  as modified by:
(A)  H.B. 1, 2002 General Session; and
(B)  H.B. 3, 2002 General Session.
(b)  The total amount of money reallocated may not exceed the sum of the
reductions made in H.B. 1, 2002 General Session and H.B. 3, 2002 General
Session.
(5) (a)  The president of Southern Utah University may reallocate between line
items the appropriations:
(i)  described in Items 170-172 in Laws of Utah 2001, Chapter 334; and
(ii)  as modified by:
(A)  H.B. 1, 2002 General Session; and
(B)  H.B. 3, 2002 General Session.
(b)  The total amount of money reallocated may not exceed the sum of the
reductions made in H.B. 1, 2002 General Session and H.B. 3, 2002 General
Session.
(6) (a)  The president of Snow College may reallocate between line items the
appropriations:
(i)  described in Items 173-175 in Laws of Utah 2001, Chapter 334; and
(ii)  as modified by:
(A)  H.B. 1, 2002 General Session; and
(B)  H.B. 3, 2002 General Session.
(b)  The total amount of money reallocated may not exceed the sum of the
reductions made in H.B. 1, 2002 General Session and H.B. 3, 2002 General
Session.
(7) (a)  The president of Dixie State College may reallocate between line
items the appropriations:
(i)  described in Items 177-179 in Laws of Utah 2001, Chapter 334; and
(ii)  as modified by:
(A)  H.B. 1, 2002 General Session; and
(B)  H.B. 3, 2002 General Session.
(b)  The total amount of money reallocated may not exceed the sum of the
reductions made in H.B. 1, 2002 General Session and H.B. 3, 2002 General
Session.
(8) (a)  The president of the College of Eastern Utah may reallocate between
line items the appropriations:
(i)  described in Items 180-183 in Laws of Utah 2001, Chapter 334; and
(ii)  as modified by:
(A)  H.B. 1, 2002 General Session; and
(B)  H.B. 3, 2002 General Session.
(b)  The total amount of money reallocated may not exceed the sum of the
reductions made in H.B. 1, 2002 General Session and H.B. 3, 2002 General
Session.
(9) (a)  The president of Utah Valley State College may reallocate between
line items the appropriations:
(i)  described in Items 184 and 185 in Laws of Utah 2001, Chapter 334; and
(ii)  as modified by:
(A)  H.B. 1, 2002 General Session; and
(B)  H.B. 3, 2002 General Session.
(b)  The total amount of money reallocated may not exceed the sum of the
reductions made in H.B. 1, 2002 General Session and H.B. 3, 2002 General
Session.
(10) (a)  The president of Salt Lake Community College may reallocate between
line items the appropriations:
(i)  described in Items 186-188 in Laws of Utah 2001, Chapter 334; and
(ii)  as modified by:
(A)  H.B. 1, 2002 General Session; and
(B)  H.B. 3, 2002 General Session.
(b)  The total amount of money reallocated may not exceed the sum of the
reductions made in H.B. 1, 2002 General Session and H.B. 3, 2002 General
Session.
(11) (a)  The State Board of Regents may reallocate between line items the
appropriations:
(i)  described in Items 189, 190, and 192-199 in Laws of Utah 2001, Chapter
334; and
(ii)  as modified by:
(A)  H.B. 1, 2002 General Session; and
(B)  H.B. 3, 2002 General Session.
(b)  The total amount of money reallocated may not exceed the sum of the
reductions made in H.B. 1, 2002 General Session and H.B. 3, 2002 General
Session.
